District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.74

Report to Council.

The Mayor shall provide a comprehensive report on the costs and benefits of the administration of the Opportunity Account Office and opportunity account programs to the Council 18 months after April 3, 2001, and every 2 years thereafter.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-266, § 15, 48 DCR 1240